District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.13

Definitions.

As used in this division:

(1)

Elementary school. —

The term “elementary school” means an institutional day or residential school, including a public elementary charter school, that provides elementary education, as determined under District of Columbia law.

(2)

Eligible entity. —

The term “eligible entity” means any of the following:

(A)

A nonprofit organization.

(B)

A consortium of non profit organizations.

(3)

Eligible student. —

The term “eligible student” means a student who is a resident of the District of Columbia and comes from a household—

(A)

receiving assistance under the supplemental nutrition assistance program established under the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.); or

(B)

whose income does not exceed—

(i)

185 percent of the poverty line; or

(ii)

in the case of a student participating in the opportunity scholarship program in the preceding year under this division or the DC School Choice Incentive Act of 2003 (§ 38-1851.01 et seq., D.C. Official Code), as such Act was in effect on the day before the date of enactment of this division [April 15, 2011], 300 percent of the poverty line.

(4)

Mayor. —

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(5)

Parent. —

The term “parent” has the meaning given that term in section 8101 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 [20 U.S.C. § 7801].

(6)

Participating eligible student. —

The term “participating eligible student” means an eligible student awarded an opportunity scholarship under this division, without regard to whether the student uses the scholarship to attend a participating school.

(7)

Participating school. —

The term “participating school” means a private elementary school or secondary school participating in the opportunity scholarship program of an eligible entity under this division.

(8)

Poverty line. —

The term “poverty line” has the meaning given that term in section 8101 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 [20 U.S.C. § 7801].

(9)

Secondary school. —

The term “secondary school” means an institutional day or residential school, including a public secondary charter school, that provides secondary education, as determined under District of Columbia law, except that the term does not include any education beyond grade 12.

(10)

Secretary. —

The term “Secretary” means the Secretary of Education.

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 210, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3013
Dec. 10, 2015, 129 Stat. 1802, Pub. L. 114-95, § 9215(ppp)(4)
Section 9215(ppp)(4) of Public Law 114-95 substituted “section 8101 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965” for “section 9101 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 7801)” in (5) and (8).